Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1308
Department; political subdivisions; advisory capacity; planning, locating, constructing, maintaining; highways, roads, streets.

The department shall have the authority to act in an advisory capacity, upon request, to any political or governmental subdivision or public corporation of this state in matters pertaining to the planning, locating, constructing, and maintaining of roads, highways, and streets and other related matters. The department, in such instances, may provide services and may cooperate with such subdivisions and corporations on such terms as may be mutually agreed upon.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 8, p. 420.